src/morphology/inflection/nouns.lexc
LEXICON N_BACK_NOMINATIVE
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:0   N_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

LEXICON N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:0   N_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

LEXICON N_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT
[NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:%>t     N_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

LEXICON N_FRONT_PLNOM_CLIT
[NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:%>t     N_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

LEXICON N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS
0    N_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT   ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:%>n     N_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:%>tta   N_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:%>lta   N_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:%>lla   N_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:%>lle   N_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT      ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:%>sta   N_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:%>ssa   N_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:%>kse   N_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL       ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:%>ksi   N_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:%>ksi   N_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON N_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS
0    N_FRONT_PLNOM_CLIT   ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:%>n     N_FRONT_CLIT_OPT   ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:%>ttä   N_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:%>ltä   N_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:%>llä   N_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:%>lle   N_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT      ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:%>stä   N_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:%>ssä   N_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:%>kse   N_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL       ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:%>ksi   N_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:%>ksi   N_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS
[NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:%>na N_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:0  N_BACK_POSS   ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:0  N_BACK_POSS   ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:0  N_BACK_POSS   ;

LEXICON N_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS
[NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:%>nä N_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:0  N_FRONT_POSS   ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:0  N_FRONT_POSS   ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:0  N_FRONT_POSS   ;

LEXICON N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS
[NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:%>i%>tta   N_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:%>i%>lta   N_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:%>i%>lla   N_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:%>i%>lle   N_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT      ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:%>i%>sta   N_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:%>i%>ssa   N_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=INS]:%>i%>n    N_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:%>i%>kse  N_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL        ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:%>i%>ksi  N_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON N_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS
[NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:%>i%>ttä   N_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:%>i%>ltä   N_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:%>i%>llä   N_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:%>i%>lle   N_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT      ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:%>i%>stä   N_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:%>i%>ssä   N_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=INS]:%>i%>n    N_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:%>i%>kse  N_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL        ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:%>i%>ksi  N_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS
[NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:%>i%>na   N_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;
[CASE=CMT]:%>i%>ne        N_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT      ;

LEXICON N_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS
[NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:%>i%>nä   N_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;
[CASE=CMT]:%>i%>ne        N_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT      ;

LEXICON N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A
[NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:%>a      N_BACK_POSS_OPT      ;

LEXICON N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä
[NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:%>ä      N_FRONT_POSS_OPT      ;

LEXICON N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN
[NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:%>a      N_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;

LEXICON N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN
0[NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:%>ä     N_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT     ;

LEXICON N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA
[NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:%>ta     N_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;

LEXICON N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ
[NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:%>tä     N_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;

LEXICON N_BACK_ILLATIVE_HAN
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%>han    N_BACK_CLIT_OPT         ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%>ha     N_BACK_POSS     ;

LEXICON N_BACK_ILLATIVE_HEN
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%>hen    N_BACK_CLIT_OPT         ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%>he     N_BACK_POSS     ;

LEXICON N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HEN
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%>hen    N_FRONT_CLIT_OPT         ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%>he     N_FRONT_POSS     ;

LEXICON N_BACK_ILLATIVE_HIN
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%>hin    N_BACK_CLIT_OPT         ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%>hi     N_BACK_POSS     ;

LEXICON N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HIN
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%>hin    N_FRONT_CLIT_OPT         ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%>hi     N_FRONT_POSS     ;

LEXICON N_BACK_ILLATIVE_HON
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%>hon    N_BACK_CLIT_OPT         ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%>ho     N_BACK_POSS     ;

LEXICON N_BACK_ILLATIVE_HUN
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%>hun    N_BACK_CLIT_OPT         ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%>hu     N_BACK_POSS     ;

LEXICON N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HYN
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%>hyn    N_FRONT_CLIT_OPT         ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%>hy     N_FRONT_POSS     ;

LEXICON N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HÄN
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%>hän    N_FRONT_CLIT_OPT         ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%>hä     N_FRONT_POSS     ;

LEXICON N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HÖN
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%>hön    N_FRONT_CLIT_OPT         ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%>hö     N_FRONT_POSS     ;

LEXICON N_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%>an     N_BACK_CLIT_OPT         ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%>a      N_BACK_POSS     ;

LEXICON N_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%>en     N_BACK_CLIT_OPT         ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%>e      N_BACK_POSS     ;

LEXICON N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%>en     N_FRONT_CLIT_OPT         ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%>e      N_FRONT_POSS     ;

LEXICON N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IN
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%>in     N_BACK_CLIT_OPT         ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%>i      N_BACK_POSS     ;

LEXICON N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IN
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%>in     N_FRONT_CLIT_OPT         ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%>i      N_FRONT_POSS     ;

LEXICON N_BACK_ILLATIVE_ON
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%>on     N_BACK_CLIT_OPT         ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%>o      N_BACK_POSS     ;

LEXICON N_BACK_ILLATIVE_UN
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%>un     N_BACK_CLIT_OPT         ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%>u      N_BACK_POSS     ;

LEXICON N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_YN
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%>yn     N_FRONT_CLIT_OPT         ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%>y      N_FRONT_POSS     ;

LEXICON N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%>än     N_FRONT_CLIT_OPT         ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%>ä      N_FRONT_POSS     ;

LEXICON N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÖN
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%>ön     N_FRONT_CLIT_OPT         ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%>ö      N_FRONT_POSS     ;

LEXICON N_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%>seen      N_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%>see       N_BACK_POSS     ;

LEXICON N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_SEEN
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%>seen      N_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%>see       N_FRONT_POSS     ;

LEXICON N_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN
[NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:%>i%>den    N_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:%>i%>de     N_BACK_POSS     ;

LEXICON N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN
[NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:%>i%>den    N_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:%>i%>de     N_FRONT_POSS     ;

LEXICON N_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN
[NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:%>i%>tten     N_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:%>i%>tte      N_BACK_POSS     ;

LEXICON N_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN
[NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:%>i%>tten     N_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:%>i%>tte      N_FRONT_POSS     ;

LEXICON N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN
[NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:%>i%>en   N_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:%>i%>e    N_BACK_POSS     ;

LEXICON N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN
[NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:%>i%>en   N_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:%>i%>e    N_FRONT_POSS     ;

LEXICON N_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN
[NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:%>j%>en    N_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:%>j%>e     N_BACK_POSS     ;

LEXICON N_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN
[NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:%>j%>en    N_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:%>j%>e     N_FRONT_POSS     ;

LEXICON N_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN
[NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:%>ten    N_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:%>te     N_BACK_POSS     ;

LEXICON N_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN
[NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:%>ten    N_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:%>te     N_FRONT_POSS     ;

LEXICON N_BACK_GENITIVE_IN
[NUM=PL][CASE=GEN][STYLE=ARCHAIC]:%>i%>n    N_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=GEN][STYLE=ARCHAIC]:%>i     N_BACK_POSS     ;

LEXICON N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN
[NUM=PL][CASE=GEN][STYLE=ARCHAIC]:%>i%>n    N_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=GEN][STYLE=ARCHAIC]:%>i     N_FRONT_POSS     ;

LEXICON N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA
[NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:%>i%>a    N_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;

LEXICON N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ
[NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:%>i%>ä    N_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;

LEXICON N_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA
[NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:%>i%>ta   N_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;

LEXICON N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ
[NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:%>i%>tä   N_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;

LEXICON N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA
[NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:%>j%>a     N_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;

LEXICON N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ
[NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:%>j%>ä     N_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT      ;

LEXICON N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN
[NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:%>i%>hin   #    ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:%>i%>hi    N_BACK_POSS     ;

LEXICON N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN
[NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:%>i%>hin   #    ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:%>i%>hi    N_FRONT_POSS     ;

LEXICON N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN
[NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:%>i%>in    #     ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:%>i%>i     N_BACK_POSS     ;

LEXICON N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN
[NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:%>i%>in    #     ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:%>i%>i     N_FRONT_POSS     ;

LEXICON N_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN
[NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:%>i%>siin  #     ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:%>i%>sii   N_BACK_POSS     ;

LEXICON N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN
[NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:%>i%>siin  #     ;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:%>i%>sii   N_FRONT_POSS     ;

LEXICON N_BACK_POSS
[POSS=SG1]:%>ni  N_BACK_CLIT_OPT        ;
[POSS=SG2]:%>si  N_BACK_CLIT_OPT        ;
[POSS=SG3]:%>nsa N_BACK_CLIT_OPT        ;
[POSS=PL1]:%>mme N_BACK_CLIT_OPT        ;
[POSS=PL2]:%>nne N_BACK_CLIT_OPT        ;
[POSS=PL3]:%>nsa N_BACK_CLIT_OPT        ;

LEXICON N_FRONT_POSS
[POSS=SG1]:%>ni  N_FRONT_CLIT_OPT        ;
[POSS=SG2]:%>si  N_FRONT_CLIT_OPT        ;
[POSS=SG3]:%>nsä N_FRONT_CLIT_OPT        ;
[POSS=PL1]:%>mme N_FRONT_CLIT_OPT        ;
[POSS=PL2]:%>nne N_FRONT_CLIT_OPT        ;
[POSS=PL3]:%>nsä N_FRONT_CLIT_OPT        ;

LEXICON N_BACK_POSS_AN
[POSS=SG3]:%>an    N_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
[POSS=PL3]:%>an    N_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON N_BACK_POSS_EN
[POSS=SG3]:%>en    N_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
[POSS=PL3]:%>en    N_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON N_FRONT_POSS_EN
[POSS=SG3]:%>en    N_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
[POSS=PL3]:%>en    N_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON N_FRONT_POSS_ÄN
[POSS=SG3]:%>än    N_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
[POSS=PL3]:%>än    N_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON N_BACK_CLIT
[CLIT=HAN]:%>han   #        ;
[CLIT=HAN][CLIT=KAAN]:%>hankaan  #        ;
[CLIT=HAN][CLIT=KO]:%>hanko #        ;
[CLIT=HAN][CLIT=PA]:%>hanpa #        ;
[CLIT=KO]:%>ko #        ;
[CLIT=KO][CLIT=HAN]:%>kohan #        ;
[CLIT=KO][CLIT=KAAN]:%>kokaan    #        ;
[CLIT=KO][CLIT=KIN]:%>kokin    #        ;
[CLIT=KO][CLIT=PA]:%>kopa   #        ;
[CLIT=KO][CLIT=S]:%>kos    #        ;
[CLIT=PA]:%>pa #        ;
[CLIT=PA][CLIT=HAN]:%>pahan #        ;
[CLIT=PA][CLIT=KAAN]:%>pakaan    #        ;
[CLIT=PA][CLIT=KIN]:%>pakin    #        ;
[CLIT=PA][CLIT=KO]:%>pako   #        ;
[CLIT=PA][CLIT=S]:%>pas    #        ;
[CLIT=KIN]:%>kin  #        ;
[CLIT=KIN][CLIT=HAN]:%>kinhan  #        ;
[CLIT=KIN][CLIT=KAAN]:%>kinkaan #        ;
[CLIT=KIN][CLIT=KO]:%>kinko    #        ;
[CLIT=KIN][CLIT=PA]:%>kinpa    #        ;
[CLIT=KAAN]:%>kaan  #        ;
[CLIT=KAAN][CLIT=HAN]:%>kaanhan  #        ;
[CLIT=KAAN][CLIT=KIN]:%>kaankin #        ;
[CLIT=KAAN][CLIT=KO]:%>kaanko    #        ;
[CLIT=KAAN][CLIT=PA]:%>kaanpa    #        ;
